Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20208-198
Financial institutions; designation of receiver and liquidating agent; department; powers.

The department may be designated the receiver and liquidating agent for any financial institution chartered by the department and, subject to the district court's supervision and control, may proceed to liquidate such financial institution or reorganize it in accordance with the Nebraska Banking Act.

Laws 1929, c. 38, § 11, p. 163;

C.S.1929, § 8-192;

Laws 1933, c. 18, § 52, p. 162;

Laws 1941, c. 9, § 1, p. 79;

Laws 1941, c. 180, § 1, p. 700;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-192;

R.S.1943, § 8-184;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 98, p. 174;

Laws 1985, LB 653, § 7;

Laws 1998, LB 1321, § 20;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 95.

This section does not constitute an unlawful delegation of judicial power to an executive department of government. Department of Banking v. Hedges, 136 Neb. 382, 286 N.W. 277 (1939).

Under 1929 act, Department of Banking was ineligible to be appointed judicial receiver as it is not a qualified legal entity. State ex rel. Sorensen v. Hoskins State Bank, 132 Neb. 878, 273 N.W. 834 (1937).

Under 1929 act, the appointment of a receiver was a judicial act to be performed by the courts. State ex rel. Sorensen v. Nebraska State Bank, 124 Neb. 449, 247 N.W. 31 (1933).

Under 1929 act, this section in a judicial proceeding amounted to no more than a legislative recommendation to the judiciary to appoint secretary as receiver. State ex rel. Sorensen v. State Bank of Minatare, 123 Neb. 109, 242 N.W. 278 (1932).